Hawaii statutes.
§651-39 Available in all circuits. Any
writ of execution or other writ issued for the purpose of carrying into effect
any final order, judgment, or decree of any circuit court or circuit judge at
chambers shall be available against the property of the person against whom the
writ shall issue in whatever circuit the property is situated and the writ
shall be as effective for all purposes in each of the circuits as in the
circuit where it is issued. [L 1905, c 10, §1; RL 1925, §2443; RL 1935, §4142;
RL 1945, §10169; RL 1955, §233-38; HRS §651-39]

Case Notes

Aircraft subject to execution, where judgment creditor had no
actual knowledge that judgment debtor had sold aircraft, and buyer did not
register title. 6 H. App. 25, 709 P.2d 613 (1985).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next